Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 991a-4.3 of Title 22, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Educational advancement activity” means a high school
diploma or high school equivalency diploma, a bachelor’s or
associate’s degree, or a certificate of completion of vocational
training; and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1372 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. “Supervising agency” means an agency providing probation
supervision, whether conducted by the Department of Corrections, a
district attorney, or a private supervision provider.
B. Any offender who receives a sentence that is suspended in
whole or in part with probation pursuant to the provisions of
Section 991a of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes may be eligible to
earn credits that reduce the person’s full probation term. No
person convicted of an offense under Section 13.1 or subsection C,
D, E, F, G, or J of Section 644 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
shall be eligible for earned credits pursuant to this section.
1. When an offender successfully completes the first year of
supervised probation or the entire period of supervised probation,
whichever is shorter, the supervising agency shall award the
offender earned credits equal to one quarter (1/4) of the person’s
probation length. Each supervising agency may establish rules to
determine successful completion under this subsection. An offender
may only earn completion credit once during the term of his or her
probation.
2. When an offender successfully completes an educational
advancement activity while on supervised probation, the supervising
agency shall award a compliant offender with earned credits equal to
one quarter (1/4) of the person’s probation length. An offender can
only earn education credit once during the term of his or her
probation.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1372 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. The supervising agency shall maintain a record of credits
earned by an offender under this section. No less than once
annually from the date the offender is placed on supervised
probation, the supervising agency shall notify the offender of the
projected probation termination date.
D. The supervising agency shall notify the court of the
offender’s reduction in his or her probation term under this
subsection when:
1. The offender satisfies restitution and all nonmonetary
conditions of his or her probation; and
2. The accumulation of time served on probation and any earned
reduction is equal to the imposed probation term or when the
supervising agency has completed supervised probation, whichever is
earlier.
E. Upon receipt of the information in subsection D of this
section, the court shall enter an order modifying the length of the
probation term. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the
supervising agency from requesting an earlier probation termination
date.
F. The Department of Corrections and other supervising agencies
shall develop written policies and procedures necessary for the
implementation of earned credits as authorized by this section. The
policies and procedures developed by the Department of Corrections
shall include, but not be limited to, written guidelines regarding
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1372 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the process to earn credits and the application of the credits
toward the reduction of the term of probation.
G. If an offender is no longer supervised by a supervising
agency but has completed an educational advancement activity and
would qualify for earned credits under paragraph 2 of subsection B
of this section, the offender may file a motion with the sentencing
court seeking a one-quarter reduction of his or her probation term.
If the court finds that the offender has completed an educational
advancement activity and the offender has not yet received education
credit under the term of his or her probation, the court shall grant
the motion.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, WORKFORCE
AND TOURISM
February 24, 2026 - DO PASS










SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1372 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)